District of Columbia statutes.
2-1105

“Washington metropolitan region” defined.

As used in this chapter, the term “Washington metropolitan region” includes the District of Columbia, the Counties of Montgomery and Prince Georges in the State of Maryland, the Counties of Arlington and Fairfax and the Cities of Alexandria and Falls Church in the Commonwealth of Virginia.

History

June 27, 1960, 74 Stat. 224, Pub. L. 86-527, § 6

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-2105.
1973 Ed., § 1-1305.

Editor's Notes

Because of the enactment of subchapter II of Chapter 22 of Title 1 subchapter IV of Chapter 12 of Title 2, 2001 Ed. by D.C. Law 5-89, the preexisting text, including §§ 1-2201 through 1-2205 §§ 2-1201.01 through 2-1201.05, 2001 Ed., has been designated as subchapter I.